New Jersey, session 221, S2458.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall allow an individual to schedule an unemployment service appointment at a One Stop Career Center, as that term is defined by section 3 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-3), over the telephone or the Internet. As used in this section, unemployment service appointment means a scheduled meeting related to receiving or applying for unemployment benefits. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.